California statutes. Financial Code
50207.

(a) A license, along with any currently effective order of the commissioner approving use of a different name pursuant to Sections 50120 and 50130, shall be conspicuously posted in the place of business authorized by the license.

(b) A license is not transferable or assignable. A license issued to a partnership or a limited partnership is not transferred or assigned within the
 meaning of this section by the death, withdrawal, or admission of a partner, general partner, or limited partner, unless the death, withdrawal, or admission dissolves the partnership to which the license was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Operative January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

50208.

The license shall state the name of the licensee. If the licensee is a partnership, the license shall state the names of its general partners. If the licensee is a corporation or an association, the license shall state the date and place of the corporation’s incorporation or organization. If the licensee is a residential mortgage lender or servicer, the license shall state the address of the licensee’s principal business
 location. The license shall state whether the licensee is licensed as a residential mortgage loan lender or servicer or as a mortgage loan originator.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 68.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50209.

The unique identifier of any licensed mortgage loan originator shall be clearly shown on all residential mortgage loan application forms, solicitations, or advertisements, including business cards or Internet Web sites, and any other documents as established by rule, regulation, or order of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 69.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Administration and Powers of the Commissioner [50301. - 50333.]

50301.

Without limitation, the functions, powers, and duties of the commissioner include the following:

(a) To issue or refuse to issue a license as provided by this division.

(b) To revoke or suspend for cause any license as provided by this division.

(c) To keep records of licenses
 issued under this division.

(d) To receive, consider, investigate, and act upon complaints made in connection with a licensee.

(e) To prescribe the forms of and receive (1) applications for licenses and (2) reports and books and records required to be made by a licensee under this division, including annual audited financial statements.

(f) To subpoena documents and witnesses and compel their attendance and production, to administer oaths, and to require the production of books, papers, or other materials relevant to any inquiry authorized by this division.

(g) To require information with regard to a license applicant that the commissioner may deem necessary, with regard for the paramount public interest in ascertaining the experience, background,
 honesty, truthfulness, integrity, and competency of the license applicant for financial transactions involving primary or subordinate mortgage financing, and if the license applicant is an entity other than an individual, in ascertaining the honesty, truthfulness, integrity, and competency of an officer or director of the corporation, association, or other entity, or the members of a partnership.

(h) To enforce by order any provision of this division.

(i) To levy fees, fines, and charges in an amount sufficient to cover the cost of the services performed in administering this division, as set forth by rule.

(j) To appoint examiners, supervisors, experts, and special assistants as needed to effectively and efficiently administer this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50302.

(a) As often as the commissioner deems necessary and appropriate, but at least once every 48 months, the commissioner shall examine the affairs of each residential mortgage lender and servicer licensee for compliance with this division. The commissioner shall appoint suitable persons to perform the examination. The commissioner and his or her appointees may examine the books, records, and documents of the
 licensee, and may examine the licensee’s officers, directors, employees, or agents under oath regarding the licensee’s operations. The commissioner may cooperate with any agency of the state or federal government, other states, agencies, the Federal National Mortgage Association, or the Federal Home Loan Mortgage Corporation. The commissioner may accept an examination conducted by one of these entities in place of an examination by the commissioner under this law, unless the commissioner determines that the examination does not provide information necessary to enable the commissioner to fulfill his or her responsibilities under this division.

(b) The commissioner shall provide a written statement of the findings of the examination, issue a copy of that statement to each licensee’s principals, officers, or directors, and take appropriate steps to ensure correction of any violations of this division.

(c) Affiliates of a licensee are subject to examination by the commissioner on the same terms as the licensee, but only when reports from, or examination of, a licensee provides documented evidence of unlawful activity between a licensee and affiliate benefiting, affecting, or arising from the activities regulated by this division.

(d) The residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee shall pay, and the commissioner shall assess, the reasonable expenses of any examination of the licensee and affiliates, consistent with the requirements of subdivision (c) of Section 50314.

(e) The statement of the findings of an examination shall belong to the commissioner and shall not be disclosed to anyone other than the licensee, law enforcement officials, or other state or federal regulatory agencies for further investigation and
 enforcement. Reports required of licensees by the commissioner under this division and results of examinations performed by the commissioner under this division are the property of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 70.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50303.

Neither the commissioner nor any employee of the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation shall be precluded from obtaining a residential mortgage loan from a lender licensed under this division, subject to the rules that may be adopted hereunder or pursuant to other proper authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 160.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

50304.

The commissioner may, from time to time, make, amend, and rescind the rules, forms, and orders that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this law, including rules and forms governing applications and reports, and defining any terms, whether or not used in this law, provided that the definitions are consistent with the provisions of this law. For the purposes of rules and forms, the commissioner may classify loans, persons, and matters within the jurisdiction of
 the commissioner, and may prescribe different requirements for different classes. The commissioner may, in his or her discretion, waive a requirement of a rule or form if, in the opinion of the commissioner, the requirement is not in the public interest or necessary for the protection of borrowers or investors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50305.

Upon written request from the commissioner, a licensee shall forward authorization to release workpapers of the licensee’s independent auditor to the commissioner within two business days of receiving the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50306.

The commissioner may order a licensee that opens a branch office in this state or changes its business location or its locations from which activities subject to this law are conducted, without first notifying the commissioner in writing, as required by Section 50124, to forfeit to the people of the state up to one hundred dollars ($100) each day for the first 10 days and ten dollars ($10) for each day thereafter during which the branch office or changed location is
 maintained without notifying the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 178, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

50307.

(a) Each residential mortgage lender or servicer licensee shall file a report with the commissioner annually, on or before the first day of March, giving the relevant information that the commissioner reasonably requires to make the calculation required by subdivision (a) of Section 50401. The report shall be made under oath and in the form prescribed by the commissioner.

(b) A licensee shall make any other special reports to the commissioner that the commissioner may, from time to time, require.

(c) If any licensed residential mortgage lender or servicer subject to this division fails to make a report required by law or by the commissioner, the commissioner may immediately cause the books, records, papers, and affairs of that licensee to be thoroughly examined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 71.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50307.1.

The commissioner may, as the commissioner deems necessary, require licensees to provide reports concerning their residential mortgage loan servicing activities, including, but not limited to, information similar to that collected in connection with the Mortgage Servicers Survey, first published by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation in December 2007. The commissioner is additionally authorized to seek and accept information provided on a voluntary basis by residential mortgage loan servicers not subject to the commissioner’s jurisdiction. The commissioner shall post only aggregated survey results on the department’s internet website, and shall note the number of loan servicers submitting data included in the aggregated totals and the estimated percentage of outstanding mortgage loans to Californians that are serviced by these loan
 servicers, to the extent information on the number of outstanding loans is available from a reliable source. Nothing in this section is intended to reduce or change the commissioner’s authority to request and demand reports under Section 50307.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 161.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

50307.2.

The commissioner may require a licensee that employs one or more mortgage loan originators to submit to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry reports of condition, which shall be in such form and shall contain such information as the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 72.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50308.

If any person engaged in the business regulated by this division refers in any advertising to rates of interest, charges, or costs of loans, the commissioner shall require that they are stated fully and clearly in the manner that he or she deems necessary to give adequate information to prospective borrowers. If the rates or costs advertised do not apply to loans of all classes made or negotiated by that person, this fact shall be clearly indicated in the
 advertisement. Compliance with the requirements of the federal Truth in Lending Act and Regulation Z promulgated thereunder is presumed to satisfy the requirements of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50309.

The commissioner may require licensees to maintain a file of all advertising copy for a period of 90 days from the date of its use. The file shall be available to the commissioner upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50310.

Nothing in this law shall preclude a person, other than a mortgage loan originator, whose license has been suspended or revoked, summarily or otherwise, from continuing to service residential mortgage loans pursuant to servicing contracts in existence at the time of the suspension for a reasonable transition period, as determined by the commissioner, after the date of the entry of the final decision in the case suspending or
 revoking the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 72.5.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50311.

Nothing in this law shall preclude a person whose license has been suspended or revoked, summarily or otherwise, from making a residential mortgage loan pursuant to a commitment issued by that person prior to the suspension or revocation. A prospective borrower who received a commitment issued by a person whose license has been suspended or revoked may, prior to the closing of the loan, terminate the commitment and receive a refund of all money paid to that
 person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50312.

The commissioner, in his or her discretion, may honor requests from interested persons for interpretive opinions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50313.

In any proceeding under this law, the burden of proving an exemption or an exception from a definition is upon the person claiming it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50314.

(a) Every person subject to this division shall keep documents and records that will properly enable the commissioner to determine whether the residential mortgage lending or residential mortgage loan servicing functions performed by that person comply with the provisions of this division and with all rules and orders made by the commissioner under this division. Upon request of the commissioner, residential mortgage lenders and residential mortgage loan servicers shall file an authorization for disclosure to the commissioner of financial records of the licensed business pursuant to Section 7473 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) The business documents and records of every residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage loan servicer, whether required to be licensed under this division or not, are subject to inspection and examination by the commissioner at any time without prior notice. The provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to persons specified in subdivision (g) of Section 50003.

(2) Any person subject to this division shall, upon request and within the time specified in the request, allow inspection and copying of any documents and records by the commissioner or the commissioner’s authorized representative.

(c) (1) The cost of every inspection and examination of a licensee or other person subject to this division shall be paid to the commissioner by
 the licensee or person examined, and the commissioner may maintain an action for the recovery of these costs in any court of competent jurisdiction. In determining the cost of any inspection or examination, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost, including overhead, for all persons performing inspections or examinations of licensees or other persons subject to this division for the fiscal year.

(2) For the purpose of this subdivision only, no person other than a licensee shall be deemed to be a person subject to this division unless and until the person is determined to be a person subject to this division by an administrative hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or by a judicial hearing in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(d) Investigation and examination reports prepared by the commissioner’s duly designated representatives are not public reports. Those reports may be disclosed to the officers or directors of a licensee that is the subject of the report for the purpose of corrective action by the officers or directors. That type of disclosure shall not operate as a waiver of the exemption specified in Section 7929.000 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 116.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

50315.

(a) The commissioner may refer the evidence that is available concerning any violation of this law or of any rule or order adopted under this division to the district attorney of the county in which the violation occurred. The district attorney may, with or without the commissioner’s referral, institute criminal proceedings under this law. The commissioner and his or her counsel, deputies, or assistants may, upon request of the district attorney,
 assist the district attorney in presenting the law or facts at the trial.

(b) After an examination, investigation, or hearing under this division, if the commissioner deems it of public interest or advantage, he or she may certify a record to the proper prosecuting official of the county or city in which the act complained of, examined, or investigated occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50316.

(a) For any licensee, a disciplinary action taken by the State of California, another state, any agency of the federal government, or another country for any action substantially related to the activity regulated under this law may be a ground for disciplinary action by the commissioner. A certified copy of the record of the disciplinary action taken against a licensee by the State of California, another state, any agency of the federal
 government, or another country shall be conclusive evidence of the events related therein.

(b) Nothing in this section shall preclude the commissioner from applying a specific statutory provision in this division providing for discipline against a licensee as a result of disciplinary action taken against a licensee by the State of California, another state, an agency of the federal government, or another country.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 178, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

50316.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, any application for licensure, amendment to the application or registration document or notice filed under any of the laws administered by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation, or record otherwise required to be filed in this state as an electronic record pursuant to a nationwide central depository for information regarding licensees, including mortgage loan originators, or any electronic record filed through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, shall be deemed to be a valid original document upon reproduction to paper form by the Department of Financial Protection and Innovation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 162.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

50317.

(a) Any person who has been convicted of, or pleaded nolo contendere to any crime specified in subdivision (b) within the past 10 years or has been held liable in any civil action by final judgment or any administrative judgment by any public agency within the past seven years, of any of the provisions specified in subdivision (b), shall not serve as an officer, director, partner, shareholder controlling
 10 percent or more of the ownership interests, trustee, or employee of a residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage loan servicer. This subdivision shall not apply to any person whose office, employment, ownership interest, or other participation in the business of a licensed residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage loan servicer commenced prior to January 1, 1995, or whose criminal conviction, plea, or judgment occurred prior to January 1, 1995.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to criminal convictions of, pleas of nolo contendere to, or civil or administrative judgments entered for offenses including the following:

(1) Offenses specified in Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 3350) of Division 1.

(2) Offenses specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 5300) of Chapter 1 of Division 2.

(3) Offenses specified in Article 8 (commencing with Section 14750) of Chapter 4 of Division 5.

(4) Offenses specified in Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 17700) of Division 6.

(5) Offenses specified in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 18435) of Division 7.

(6) Offenses specified in provisions of the laws of the United States added or amended by the federal Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery and Enforcement Act of 1989 (Public Law 101-73).

(7) Offenses involving robbery, burglary, theft, embezzlement, fraud, fraudulent conversion or misappropriation of property, forgery, bookmaking, receiving stolen property, counterfeiting, extortion, checks, credit cards, or computer violations
 specified in Section 502 of the Penal Code. For the purpose of this section, but not Section 50318, an offense does not include a conviction for which the person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation from a court of competent jurisdiction under Section 1203.4 or 4852.13 of the Penal Code or a similar certificate of rehabilitation obtained in a foreign jurisdiction.

(c) On and after January 1, 1995, any officer, director, or other person who seeks a controlling ownership interest of 10 percent or more in the business of a licensed residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage loan servicer shall, as a condition to obtaining that interest or participation, authorize the commissioner to have access to that person’s state summary criminal history information, as defined in Section 11105 of the Penal Code, for purposes of determining whether the person has a prior conviction of, or pleaded nolo contendere to, a criminal offense
 specified in subdivision (b).

(d) Any state summary criminal history information obtained pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential and no recipient shall disclose the contents other than for the purpose of acquisition of an ownership interest in or other participation in the business of a licensed residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage loan servicer.

(e) Any person who knowingly violates subdivision (a), including, but not limited to, any residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage loan servicer who permits an ownership interest in or other participation in the business of a residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage loan servicer in violation of subdivision (a) shall, upon conviction, be subject to punishment as set forth in Section 50500.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be
 construed to permit the reinstatement of any person barred by the commissioner pursuant to Section 50320 nor to prohibit the commissioner from bringing any action pursuant to Section 50320.

(g) If any provision of this section or the application of this section to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

(h) For purposes of this section, the term “employee” means (1) a mortgage loan originator, including a loan officer or other individual who negotiates agreements with the public, or (2) an individual with access to or responsibility for trust funds held by the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 73.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50318.

(a) The commissioner may, after appropriate notice and opportunity for hearing, by order censure or suspend for a period not exceeding 12 months, or bar from any position of employment, management, or control any residential mortgage lender, residential mortgage loan servicer, or mortgage loan originator, or any other person, if the commissioner finds either of the following:

(1) That the censure, suspension, or bar is in the public interest and that the person has committed or caused a violation of this division or rule or order of the commissioner, and (A) the violation was either known or should have been known by the person committing or causing it, or (B) the violation has caused material damage to the residential mortgage lender, residential mortgage loan servicer, mortgage loan originator, or to the public.

(2) That the person (A) has been convicted of or pleaded nolo contendere to any crime, or (B) has been held liable in any civil action by final judgment, or any administrative judgment by any public agency, if that crime or civil or administrative judgment involved any offense specified in subdivision (b) of Section 50317, or any other offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a person engaged in the business in
 accordance with the provisions of this division.

(b) Within 15 days from the date of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the person may request a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Upon receiving a request, the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 30 days after receipt unless the person subject to this division consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of the notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(c) Upon receipt of a notice of intention to issue an order pursuant to this section, the person who is the subject of the proposed order is immediately prohibited from engaging in
 any activities subject to licensure under the law.

(d) Persons suspended or barred under this section are prohibited from participating in any business activity of a licensed residential mortgage lender, residential mortgage loan servicer, or mortgage loan originator and from engaging in any business activity on the premises where a licensed residential mortgage lender, residential mortgage loan servicer, or mortgage loan originator is conducting its business. This subdivision shall not be construed to prohibit suspended or barred persons from having their personal transactions processed by a licensed residential mortgage lender, residential mortgage loan servicer, or mortgage loan originator.

(e) This section shall apply to any violation, conviction, plea, or judgment after the enactment of this section.

(f) If any
 provision of this section or the application of this section to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable.

(g) For purposes of this section, the term “employee” means (1) a mortgage loan originator, including a loan officer or other individual who negotiates agreements with the public, or (2) an individual with access to or responsibility for trust funds held by the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 74.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50319.

(a) If the commissioner, as a result of any examination or from any report made to him or her, shall find that any person subject to this division is in an insolvent condition, is conducting business in an unsafe or injurious manner that renders further operations hazardous to the public or to customers, has failed to comply with the provision of Section 50317, has permitted its tangible net worth to be
 lower than the minimum required by law, or has failed to comply with the bonding requirements of Section 50205, the commissioner may, by an order addressed to and served by registered or certified mail, or by personal service on that person, and on any other person having in his or her possession or control any trust funds or other property deposited in escrow with that person, direct discontinuance of the disbursement, in whole or in part, of trust funds held by the licensee and order the establishment of a separate trust account for all subsequent trust funds received by the licensee. No person having in his or her possession any of these funds or documents shall be liable for failure to comply with the order unless he or she has received written notice of the order. Subject to subdivision (b), the order shall remain in effect until set aside by the commissioner, or the person is the subject of an order for relief in bankruptcy.

(b) Within 15
 days from the date of an order pursuant to subdivision (a), the person may request a hearing under the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 2 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Upon receiving a request, the matter shall be set for hearing to commence within 30 days after the receipt unless the person subject to this division consents to a later date. If no hearing is requested within 15 days after the mailing or service of the notice and none is ordered by the commissioner, the failure to request a hearing shall constitute a waiver of the right to a hearing. Neither the request for a hearing nor the hearing itself shall stay the order issued by the commissioner under subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 44.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

50320.

Whenever, in the opinion of the commissioner, a person is engaged, either actually or through subterfuge, in the business of making residential mortgage loans, servicing residential mortgage loans, or engaging in business as a mortgage loan originator, without a license from the commissioner, the commissioner may order that person to desist and refrain. If, within 30 days after an order is served, a request for a hearing is
 filed in writing and the hearing is not held within 60 days of the filing, the order is rescinded. This section does not apply to persons exempted under subdivision (b) of Section 50002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 75.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50321.

If, after investigation, the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that any licensee is violating or has violated its articles of incorporation or any law or rule binding upon it, the commissioner shall, by written order addressed to the licensee, direct the discontinuance of the violation. The order shall be effective immediately, but shall not become final except in accordance with the provisions of Section 50323.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 18.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

50322.

If, after investigation, the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that any licensee is conducting or has conducted business in an unsafe or injurious manner, the commissioner shall, by written order addressed to the licensee, direct the discontinuance of the unsafe or injurious practices. The order shall be effective immediately, but shall not become final except in accordance with the provisions of Section 50323.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 19.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

50323.

(a) No order issued pursuant to Section 50321 or 50322 may become final except after notice to the affected licensee of the commissioner’s intention to make the order final and of the reasons for the finding. The commissioner shall also notify the licensee that upon receiving a request the matter will be set for hearing to commence within 15 business days after receipt. The licensee may consent to have the hearing commence at a later date. If no hearing is requested within 30 days after the mailing or service of the required notice, and none is ordered by the commissioner, the order may become final without hearing and the licensee shall immediately discontinue the practices named in the order. If a hearing is requested or ordered, it shall be held in accordance with the provisions of the
 Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and the commissioner shall have all of the powers granted under that act. If, upon the hearing, it appears to the commissioner that the licensee is conducting or has conducted business in an unsafe and injurious manner or is violating or has violated its articles of incorporation or any law of this state, or any rule binding upon it, the commissioner shall make the order of discontinuance final and the licensee shall immediately discontinue the practices named in the order.

(b) The licensee has 10 days after an order is made final to commence an action to restrain enforcement of the order. If the enforcement of the order is not enjoined within 10 days by the court in which the action is brought, the licensee shall comply with the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 188, Sec. 20.   (AB 2433)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

50324.

(a) If, after investigation, the commissioner has reasonable grounds to believe that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this division or any rule or order hereunder, the commissioner may, bring an action to enjoin the acts or practices or to enforce compliance with this law or any rule or order hereunder. The action shall be brought in the name of the people of the State
 of California in the superior court. Upon a proper showing, a permanent or preliminary injunction, restraining order, or writ of mandate shall be granted. A receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court, which may include the commissioner, may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant’s assets. Any other ancillary relief may be granted as appropriate.

A receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the court appointed by the superior court pursuant to this section may, with the approval of the court, exercise any or all of the powers of the defendant’s officers, directors, partners, trustees, or persons who exercise similar powers and perform similar duties. The powers include the filing of a petition for bankruptcy. No action at law or in equity may be maintained by any party against the commissioner, or a receiver, monitor, conservator, or other designated fiduciary or officer of the
 court, by reason of their exercising these powers or performing these duties pursuant to the order of, or with the approval of, the superior court.

(b) If the commissioner determines it is in the public interest, the commissioner may include in any action authorized by subdivision (a) a claim for ancillary relief. The ancillary relief may include, but not be limited to, restitution or disgorgement or damages on behalf of the persons injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action. The court shall have jurisdiction to award additional relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50325.

The commissioner may immediately revoke the residential mortgage lender’s, residential mortgage loan servicer’s, or mortgage loan originator’s license if the licensee fails to comply with any order issued under Section 50318, 50319, 50321, 50322, or 50503. The commissioner shall not revoke the license if, within 10 days from the effective date of the revocation order, the licensee secures a court order restraining the
 enforcement of the commissioner’s revocation order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 160, Sec. 76.   (SB 36)   Effective October 11, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

50326.

If any licensee fails to do any of the following, the licensee shall forfeit to the people of the state a sum of up to one hundred dollars ($100) for every day up to the 10th day: (a) to make any report required by law or by the commissioner within 10 days from the day designated for the making of the report, or within any extension of time granted by the commissioner, or (b) fails to include therein any matter required by law or by the commissioner. Thereafter, any
 failure shall constitute grounds for the suspension or revocation of the license held by the residential mortgage lender or residential mortgage loan servicer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 994, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.   Section operative January 1, 1996, pursuant to Section 50601 (later repealed).)
-------------------------------------------

50327.

(a) The commissioner may, after notice and a reasonable opportunity to be heard, deny, decline to renew, suspend, or revoke any license if the commissioner finds that:

(1) The licensee has violated any provision of this division or any rule or order of the commissioner thereunder.

(2) Any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time of the original application for the license, reasonably would have warranted the commissioner in refusing to issue the license originally.

(b) The power of investigation and
 examination by the commissioner is not terminated by the denial, nonrenewal, surrender, suspension, or revocation of any license issued by him or her.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 264, Sec. 12.   (AB 2666)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

50328.
